Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB781.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 205.2003 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall promulgate[by] administrative regulations in accordance with[subject to the provisions of]
KRS Chapter 13A to develop a work program for recipients of public assistance under Title IV-A of the
Federal Social Security Act to provide for immediate employment or preparation for employment.
(2) The self-sufficiency of participants shall be the primary goal of the work program.[ ] Participants shall bear the
ultimate responsibility in pursuit of this goal.
(3) In partnership with participants, the cabinet shall assess their strengths and needs and provide supportive
services to assist in the pursuit of work and self-sufficiency.
(4) The cabinet shall:
(a) Develop and implement initiatives under Kentucky's Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
Employment and Training state plan, established in accordance with 7 C.F.R. sec. 273.7, to promote
improved employment outcomes and workforce participation. The initiatives shall:
1. Be related to healthy workforce habits among eligible individuals;
2. Include establishing partnerships with public and private entities, including but not limited to
workforce boards, educational institutions, employers, and community organizations;
3. Include partner-funded programs supporting household food security and improved nutrition,
including but not limited to an incentive program for the purpose of increasing the purchase
and consumption of nutritious foods both at work and at home;
4. Include job readiness, occupational training, and work-based learning opportunities;
5. Implement employment assessment and individualized employment planning; and
6. Include case management and employment navigation services;
(b) To the extent allowable by federal law, utilize federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
matching grant funds as provided in 7 C.F.R. sec. 273.7(d);
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) On or before December 1, 2026, pursue any federal approvals necessary to implement the initiatives,
including a submission of a state plan amendment to Kentucky's federally approved Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program Employment and Training state plan; and
(d) Submit a report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee
on Health Services and appear before the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services annually to
update the members of the committee regarding program participation levels, employment outcomes,
healthy workforce outcomes, federal fund draw downs, and program impacts.
Signed by Governor April 8, 2026.